Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-9,104
Critical access hospitals; rebase inpatient interim per diem rates.

The department shall provide for rebasing inpatient interim per diem rates for critical access hospitals. The department shall rebase the rates every two years, and the most recent audited medicare cost report shall be used as the basis for the rebasing process within ninety days after receiving the cost report.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 60.